Utah statutes.
7-23-503.   Reporting by commissioner.
(1)  Subject to Subsection (2), as part of the commissioner's annual report to
the governor and Legislature under Section 7-1-211, the commissioner shall
report to the governor and Legislature on the operations on an aggregate basis
of deferred deposit lenders operating in the state.
(2)  In preparing the report required by Subsection (1), the commissioner:
(a)  shall include in the report for the immediately preceding calendar year
aggregate information from the one or more operations statements filed under
Subsection 7-23-201(2)(e) by deferred deposit lenders for that calendar year;
and
(b)  may not include in the report information from an operations statement
filed with the department that could identify a specific deferred deposit
lender.
